Utah statutes.
57-2a-4.   Proof of authority -- Prima facie evidence.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3), the signature, title or rank, branch of service, and serial number, if any, of any person described in Subsection 57-2a-3(2) are sufficient proof of his authority to perform a notarial act.  Further proof of his authority is not required.

(2)  Proof of the authority of a person to perform a notarial act under the laws or regulations of a foreign country is sufficient if:

(a)  a foreign service officer of the United States resident in the country in which the act is performed or a diplomatic or consular officer of the foreign country resident in the United States certifies that a person holding that office is authorized to perform the act;

(b)  the official seal of the person performing the notarial act is affixed to the document; or

(c)  the title and indication of authority to perform notarial acts of the person appears either in a digest of foreign law or in a list customarily used as a source of such information.

(3)  The signature and title or rank of the person performing the notarial act are prima facie evidence that he is a person with the designated title and that his signature is genuine.

